Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 4 Participation of Probationers in Community Service Programs

42-8-70 through 42-8-74.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 1257, §§ 1-5; Code 1981, §

42-8-70

through 42-8-74, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1257, § 6; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1593, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 31; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1593, §§ 1, 3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 367, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 331, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1302, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 592, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 775, § 6; repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-72/HB 310, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 repeal of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 231 (2015).